Utah statutes.
58-41-7.   Waiver of specified licensure requirements -- Conditions.
The requirements of Subsections 58-41-5(3), (5), (6), and (7) shall be waived,
and a license shall be issued by the department upon application and payment
of fees by persons who:
(1)  on May 13, 1975, held the CCC or its full equivalent, or who are engaged,
and for two consecutive years of the five years immediately preceding May 13,
1975, were engaged in the active practice of speech-language pathology or
audiology in this state;
(2)  hold a doctor's or master's degree or its equivalent in the field of
speech-language pathology, speech science, or audiology; and
(3)  have provided proof of those facts to the  board with a request for a
license, prior to July 1, 1980.
